Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.85.050

Council may require information.

All degree-granting institutions subject to this chapter shall file information with the council as the council may require.

[ 2012 c 229 s 546; 1986 c 136 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.